Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 2. ESTATES OF DECEDENTS; DURABLE POWERS OF ATTORNEY

SUBTITLE K. FOREIGN WILLS, OTHER TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENTS, AND FIDUCIARIES

CHAPTER 505. FOREIGN PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVES, TRUSTEES, AND FIDUCIARIES

SUBCHAPTER A. FOREIGN CORPORATE FIDUCIARY

Sec. 505.001. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "foreign corporate fiduciary" means a corporate fiduciary that does not have its main office or a branch office in this state.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 505.002. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. (a) A foreign corporate fiduciary acting in a fiduciary capacity in this state in strict accordance with this subchapter:

(1) is not transacting business in this state within the meaning of Section 9.001, Business Organizations Code; and

(2) is qualified to serve in that capacity under Section 501.006.

(b) This subchapter is in addition to, and not a limitation on, Subtitles F and G, Title 3, Finance Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 505.003. AUTHORITY OF FOREIGN CORPORATE FIDUCIARY TO SERVE IN FIDUCIARY CAPACITY. (a) Subject to Subsections (b) and (c) and Section 505.004, a foreign corporate fiduciary may be appointed by will, deed, agreement, declaration, indenture, court order or decree, or otherwise and may serve in this state in any fiduciary capacity, including as:

(1) trustee of a personal or corporate trust;

(2) executor;

(3) administrator; or

(4) guardian of the estate.

(b) A foreign corporate fiduciary appointed to serve in a fiduciary capacity in this state must have the corporate power to act in that capacity.

(c) This section applies only to the extent that the home state of the foreign corporate fiduciary appointed to serve in a fiduciary capacity in this state grants to a corporate fiduciary whose home state is this state the authority to serve in like fiduciary capacity.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 505.004. FILING REQUIREMENTS; DESIGNATION. (a) A foreign corporate fiduciary must file the following documents with the secretary of state before qualifying or serving in this state in a fiduciary capacity as authorized by Section 505.003:

(1) a copy of the fiduciary's charter, articles of incorporation or of association, and all amendments to those documents, certified by the fiduciary's secretary under the fiduciary's corporate seal;

(2) a properly executed written instrument that by the instrument's terms is of indefinite duration and irrevocable, appointing the secretary of state and the secretary of state's successors as the fiduciary's agent for service of process on whom notices and processes issued by a court of this state may be served in an action or proceeding relating to a trust, estate, fund, or other matter within this state with respect to which the fiduciary is acting in a fiduciary capacity, including the acts or defaults of the fiduciary with respect to that trust, estate, or fund; and

(3) a written certificate of designation specifying the name and address of the officer, agent, or other person to whom the secretary of state shall forward notices and processes described by Subdivision (2).

(b) A foreign corporate fiduciary may change the certificate of designation under Subsection (a)(3) by filing a new certificate.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 505.005. SERVICE OF NOTICE OR PROCESS ON SECRETARY OF STATE. (a) On receipt of a notice or process described by Section 505.004(a)(2), the secretary of state shall promptly forward the notice or process by a qualified delivery method to the officer, agent, or other person designated by the foreign corporate fiduciary under Section 505.004 to receive the notice or process.

(b) Service of notice or process described by Section 505.004(a)(2) on the secretary of state as agent for a foreign corporate fiduciary has the same effect as if personal service had been had in this state on the foreign corporate fiduciary.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 205 (S.B. 1373), Sec. 45, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 505.006. CRIMINAL PENALTY; EFFECT OF CONVICTION. (a) A foreign corporate fiduciary commits an offense if the fiduciary violates this subchapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $5,000.

(c) On conviction, the court may prohibit a foreign corporate fiduciary convicted of an offense under this section from thereafter serving in any fiduciary capacity in this state.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER B. FOREIGN EXECUTORS AND TRUSTEES

Sec. 505.051. APPLICABILITY OF BOND REQUIREMENT. (a) A foreign executor is not required to give bond if the will appointing the foreign executor provides that the executor may serve without bond.

(b) The bond provisions of this title applicable to domestic representatives apply to a foreign executor if the will appointing the foreign executor does not exempt the foreign executor from giving bond.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 505.052. POWER TO SELL PROPERTY. (a) If a foreign will has been recorded in the deed records of a county in this state in the manner provided by this subtitle and the will gives an executor or trustee the power to sell property located in this state:

(1) an order of a court of this state is not necessary to authorize the executor or trustee to make the sale and execute proper conveyance; and

(2) any specific directions the testator gave in the foreign will respecting the sale of the estate property must be followed unless the directions have been annulled or suspended by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 501.002(c), the original signatures required by that section may not be required for purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER C. RECOVERY OF DEBTS BY FOREIGN EXECUTOR OR ADMINISTRATOR

Sec. 505.101. SUIT TO RECOVER DEBT. (a) On giving notice by a qualified delivery method to all creditors of a decedent in this state who have filed a claim against the decedent's estate for a debt due to the creditor, a foreign executor or administrator of a person who was a nonresident at the time of death may maintain a suit in this state for the recovery of debts due to the decedent.

(b) The plaintiff's letters testamentary or of administration granted by a competent tribunal, properly authenticated, must be filed with the suit.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 205 (S.B. 1373), Sec. 46, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 505.102. JURISDICTION. (a) A foreign executor or administrator who files a suit authorized by Section 505.101 submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in a proceeding relating to the recovery of a debt owed to a resident of this state by the decedent whose estate the executor or administrator represents.

(b) Jurisdiction under this section is limited to the amount of money or value of personal property recovered in this state by the foreign executor or administrator.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 505.103. RESTRICTION ON SUIT BROUGHT BY FOREIGN EXECUTOR OR ADMINISTRATOR. A suit may not be maintained in this state by a foreign executor or administrator for a decedent's estate under this subchapter if there is:

(1) an executor or administrator of the decedent's estate qualified by a court of this state; or

(2) a pending application in this state for the appointment of an executor or administrator of the decedent's estate.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.